California, session 20252026, AB2053.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 78044) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7 of Title 3 of the Education Code, to read: Article 3.1. Coast Community College District Workforce-Aligned Cybersecurity Baccalaureate Degree Program78044. For purposes of this article, “regional public university” means a public university located within the community college district’s service area.78044.2. (a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 66010.4 or Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040), the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges may authorize the Coast Community College District to offer a workforce-aligned cybersecurity baccalaureate degree program at Coastline College.(2) The chancellor shall ensure that the application and review procedures and requirements described in paragraphs (1), (3), and (4) of subdivision (h) of Section 78042 are met for any program authorized pursuant to this article.(b) The governing board of the Coast Community College District shall submit a proposal for the baccalaureate degree program to be authorized pursuant to this article to the chancellor. The proposal shall include all of the following:(1) Data supporting the regional labor-market demand for the proposed degree program.(2) Data demonstrating the lack of availability of the proposed degree program at the regional public universities or the inability of a degree program offered at a regional public university to meet the demand for the degreed, skilled workforce in the region.(3) Evidence of collaboration that prioritizes structured partnerships between the Coast Community College District and regional public universities to avoid unnecessary duplication and to expand access to baccalaureate degrees. The structured partnerships may include, but not be limited to, any of the following:(A) Guaranteed transfer agreements.(B) 2+2 articulation agreements.(C) Dual enrollment pathways with high school and public university partners such as 1+1+2 models.(D) Credit for prior learning.(E) Shared use of facilities to support colocation or cross-location delivery models.(4) Evidence of program approval through the appropriate accreditation body, if necessary.(c) Full-time equivalent students enrolled in a baccalaureate program authorized pursuant to this article shall be included in the funding model developed and adopted pursuant to, and the fee provisions described in, subdivision (g) of Section 78042.78044.4. (a) On or before July 1, 2030, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall conduct and present to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Governor, an interim evaluation of the baccalaureate degree program offered pursuant to this article that includes all of the following:(1) Trends in workforce demand in the region that may require additional degree programs to be offered by the Coast Community College District or other regional partners.(2) Completion rates, if available, for each cohort of students in the degree program.(3) Information on the impact of the degree program on underserved and underprepared students.(4) Information regarding other forms of collaboration between the Coast Community College District and public universities to address workforce demand in the region.(b) On or before July 1, 2034, the Legislative Analyst’s Office shall conduct and present to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, and to the Governor, a final evaluation of the baccalaureate degree program offered pursuant to this article that includes all of the following:(1) Data regarding students participating in the degree program, including the number of applicants, admitted students, enrolled students, and degree recipients.(2) The extent to which the degree program meets identified workforce needs in the region, including regional supply and demand data that considers the capacity of the California State University, the University of California, and the independent colleges and universities in the region.(3) Information on the place of employment of students in the degree program and the subsequent job placement of graduates of the degree program.(4) Time-to-degree rates and completion rates for students in the degree program.(5) Information regarding other areas of collaboration between the Coast Community College District and regional partners and how those partnerships addressed regional workforce needs.(6) Information on the impact of the degree program on underserved and underprepared students.(7) Recommendations on whether and how the degree program can or should be expanded or amended based on the results of the evaluation.(c) (1) The Coast Community College District shall provide the information necessary to conduct the evaluation, as determined by the Legislative Analyst’s Office, to the chancellor.(2) The chancellor shall provide the information received pursuant to paragraph (1) to the Legislative Analyst’s Office upon request.78044.5. This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because there is a need for a workforce skilled in the field of cybersecurity from regional employers.